Hawaii statutes.
[§440E-4] Powers and duties of the
director. (a) In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by
law, the director shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To adopt, amend, or repeal rules and forms
necessary to effectuate this chapter. All rules shall be adopted pursuant to
chapter 91 and shall have the force and effect of law. The rules may include,
but not be limited to the following:

(A) An appropriate method of ensuring that
all financial obligations are met by a promoter who conducts, holds, or gives a
mixed martial arts contest;

(B) A public record accounting for the
distribution of all tickets provided to the director by a promoter and anything
else of value that is provided to the director;

(C) Clinics or seminars on health and safety
for licensees deemed necessary by the director;

(D) Criteria for a mandatory neurological and
eye examination of any mixed martial arts contestant;

(E) Criteria for and duration of an automatic
medical suspension from mixed martial arts contests;

(F) Procedures to evaluate the professional
records and physician's certification of each mixed martial arts contestant
participating in a mixed martial arts contest in the State and to deny
authorization to a mixed martial arts contestant to fight when the requirements
of this chapter are not met;

(G) Procedures to ensure that no mixed
martial arts contestant is permitted to compete while under suspension from any
entity that regulates mixed martial arts due to:

(i) A recent knockout or series of consecutive
losses;

(ii) An injury, any required medical procedure,
or a physician's denial of certification to compete;

(iii) Failure of any drug test; or

(iv) The use of false aliases or falsifying or
attempting to falsify official identification cards or documents relating to
mixed martial arts contests;

(H) Procedures to review a suspension if
appealed by a mixed martial arts contestant, including an opportunity for the
contestant to present contradictory evidence;

(I) Procedures to revoke a suspension if a
mixed martial arts contestant furnishes proof of sufficiently improved medical
or physical condition or furnishes proof that the suspension was not, or is no
longer, warranted by the facts; and

(J) Procedures to require updated medical and
criminal background checks prior to a contest and at license renewal;

(2) To enforce this chapter and the rules adopted
pursuant thereto;

(3) To discipline a person or entity who violates
this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant thereto; and

(4) To appoint an advisory committee to assist with
the implementation of this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant thereto.

(b) The director may either establish a mixed
martial arts registry or data bank on mixed martial arts contestants or use an
established registry or data bank that is approved by the director, and issue
license cards to mixed martial arts contestants. [L 2007, c 279, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next